Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201849-1806
Form of unsworn declaration.

An unsworn declaration under the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act must be in substantially the following form:

I declare under penalty of perjury under the law of the State of Nebraska that the foregoing is true and correct, and that I am physically located outside the geographic boundaries of the United States, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, and any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

Executed on the ........ day of .............,......., at (date)(month)(year)

......................................,..................... .(city or other location, and state)(country)......................................(printed name)......................................(signature)

Laws 2017, LB57, § 8.